Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB388.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 271B.8-300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A director shall discharge his or her duties as a director, including his or her duties
as a member of a committee:
(a) In good faith;
(b) On an informed basis; and
(c) In a manner he or she honestly believes to be in the best interests of the
corporation.
(2) A director shall be considered to discharge his or her duties on an informed basis if
he or she makes, with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would
exercise under similar circumstances, inquiry into the business and affairs of the
corporation, or into a particular action to be taken or decision to be made.
(3) In discharging his or her duties a director shall be entitled to rely on information,
opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial
data, if prepared or presented by:
(a) One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director
honestly believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;
(b) Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director
honestly believes are within the person's professional or expert competence;
or
(c) A committee of the board of directors of which he or she is not a member, if
the director honestly believes the committee merits confidence.
(4) A director shall not be considered to be acting in good faith if he or she:
(a) Has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance
otherwise permitted by subsection (3) of this section unwarranted; or
(b) Takes any action to implement or maintain diversity, equity, and inclusion
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1286
initiatives or environmental, social, and governance investing.
(5) In addition to any other limitation on a director's liability for monetary damages
contained in any provision of the corporation's articles of incorporation adopted in
accordance with subsection (2)(d) of KRS 271B.2-020, any action taken as a
director, or any failure to take any action as a director, shall not be the basis for
monetary damages or injunctive relief unless:
(a) The director has breached or failed to perform the duties of the director's
office in compliance with this section; and
(b) In the case of an action for monetary damages, the breach or failure to
perform constitutes willful misconduct or wanton or reckless disregard for the
best interests of the corporation and its shareholders.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section shall not apply to any action taken as a director, or
any failure to take any action as a director, regarding the implementation or
maintenance of diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives or environmental,
social, and governance investing.
(7)[(6)] A person bringing an action for monetary damages under this section shall
have the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence the provisions of
subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section, and the burden of proving that the breach
or failure to perform was the legal cause of damages suffered by the corporation.
(8)[(7)] Nothing in this section shall eliminate or limit the liability of any director for
any act or omission occurring prior to July 15, 1988.
(9) In an action brought in the right of a domestic corporation under Section 2 of
this Act, neither the business judgment rule nor any other provision of this
chapter shall operate as an affirmative defense where the damages alleged to
have been suffered by the corporation are the result of diversity, equity, and
inclusion initiatives or environmental, social, and governance investing.
(10) As used in this section:
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1286
(a) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives" means:
1. Policies, practices, or procedures designed or implemented to promote
or provide differential treatment or benefits to individuals on the basis
of religion, race, sex, color, or national origin, including but not
limited to any such policy, practice, or procedure related to
employment, employee recruitment, employee hiring, employee
promotion, contracts, or contract renewal; and
2. Does not include any policy, practice, procedure, office, employee,
training, program, or activity that is required pursuant to state or
federal antidiscrimination laws, or differential treatment or benefits
necessary to provide medical treatment; and
(b) "Environmental, social, and governance investing" means an investment
strategy that emphasizes a firm's governance structure or the environmental
or social impacts of the firm's products or practices, including but not
limited to using a set of standards to screen potential investments based
upon the perceived impact to the environment and the social relationships
between a firm's employees and the community.
(11)[(8)] In a public benefit corporation:
(a) The board of directors shall manage or direct the business and affairs of the
public benefit corporation in a manner that balances the pecuniary interests of
the stockholders, the best interests of those materially affected by the
corporation's conduct, and the specific public benefit or public benefits
identified in its articles of incorporation;
(b) A director of the public benefit corporation shall not, by virtue of the public
benefit provisions set forth in the corporation's articles of incorporation, have
any duty to any person on account of any interest of the person in the public
benefit or public benefits identified in the articles of incorporation or on
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1286
account of any interest materially affected by the corporation's conduct;
(c) With respect to a decision implicating the balance requirement in paragraph
(a) of this subsection, a director shall act in conformity with subsection (1) of
this section; and
(d) The articles of incorporation of a public benefit corporation may include a
provision that any disinterested failure to satisfy this subsection shall not
constitute an act or omission not in good faith or a breach of the duty of
loyalty.
Section 2. KRS 271B.7-400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not commence a proceeding in the right of a domestic or foreign
corporation unless he or she was a shareholder of the corporation when the
transaction complained of occurred or unless he or she became a shareholder
through transfer by operation of law from one who was a shareholder at that time.
The derivative proceeding shall not be maintained if it appears that the person
commencing the proceeding does not fairly and adequately represent the interests of
the shareholders in enforcing the right of the corporation.
(2) A complaint in a proceeding brought in the right of a corporation shall be verified
and allege with particularity the demand made, if any, to obtain action by the board
of directors and either that the demand was refused or ignored or why he or she did
not make the demand. Whether or not a demand for action was made, if the
corporation commences an investigation of the charges made in the demand or
complaint, the court may stay any proceeding until the investigation is completed.
(3) A proceeding commenced under this section may not be discontinued or settled
without the court's approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance
or settlement will substantially affect the interest of the corporation's shareholders
or a class of shareholders, the court shall direct that notice be given the shareholders
affected.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1286
(4) On termination of the proceeding the court may require the plaintiff to pay any
defendant's reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in defending the
proceeding if it finds that the proceeding was commenced without reasonable cause.
(5) The court shall award a plaintiff who prevails in a proceeding brought in the
right of a domestic corporation reasonable attorney's fees, costs, and expert
witness fees and expenses, and may award compensatory and punitive damages,
if the damages suffered by the corporation were the result of diversity, equity, and
inclusion initiatives or environmental, social, and governance investing, as those
terms are defined in Section 1 of this Act.
(6)[(5)] For purposes of this section, "shareholder" includes a beneficial owner whose
shares are held in a voting trust or held by a nominee on his behalf.
(7)[(6)] In any derivative proceedings in the right of a foreign corporation, the matters
covered by this section shall be governed by the laws of the jurisdiction of
incorporation.
(8)[(7)] The articles of incorporation of the corporation may provide that proper venue
for a derivative action or an action to compel the production of books and records is
in or only is in the appropriate court.
(9)[(8)] Shareholders of a public benefit corporation owning individually or
collectively, as of the date of instituting a derivative proceeding, at least two
percent (2%) of the corporation's outstanding shares or, in the case of a corporation
with shares listed on a national securities exchange, the lesser of that percentage or
shares of at least two million dollars ($2,000,000) in market value, may maintain a
derivative proceeding to enforce the requirements[ set forth] in KRS 271B.8-
300(11)[(8)].
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:52 AM Jacketed